Idaho, session 2026, H0575.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-1001, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-1001. DUTIES OF CONTROLLER. It is the duty of the state controller:
(1) To superintend the fiscal concerns of the state, with its account-
ing, informational, payroll, and related data processing services.
(2) To deliver to the governor and the legislative services office on
or before the first day of January a financial statement that complies with
generally accepted accounting principles of the funds of the state, its rev-
enues, and of the public expenditures during the preceding fiscal year.
(3) When requested, to give information in writing to either house of
the legislature relating to the fiscal affairs of the state or the duties of
his office.
(4) To suggest plans and provide internal control standards for the im-
provement and management of the public revenues, assets, expenditures, and
liabilities.
(5) To keep and state all funds in which the state is interested.
(6) To keep an account of all warrants drawn upon the treasurer, and a
separate account under the head of each specified appropriation, showing at
all times the unexpended balance of such appropriation.
(7) To keep an account between the state and the treasurer and therein
to charge the treasurer with the balance in the treasury when he came into
office and with all moneys received by him and to credit him with all warrants
drawn on and paid by him.
(8) To keep a register of warrants showing the fund or funds upon which
they are drawn, the number, in whose favor, the appropriation applicable to
the payment thereof, and when the liability accrued.
(9) To examine and settle the accounts of all persons indebted to the
state.
(10) In his discretion, to require any person presenting an account for
settlement to be sworn before him and to answer, orally or in writing, as to
any facts relating to the account for settlement.
(11) To require all persons who have received any moneys belonging to
the state, and have not accounted therefor, to settle their accounts.


(12) To account for the collection of all moneys due the state that are
not the responsibility of any other agency and institute suits in its name
for all official delinquencies in relation to assessment, collection and
payment of the revenue, against persons who by any means have become pos-
sessed of public money or property and fail to pay over or deliver the same,
and against all debtors of the state, of which suits the courts of Ada county
have jurisdiction, without regard to the residence of the defendants.
(13) To draw warrants on the treasurer for the payment of moneys di-
rected by law to be paid out of the treasury; but no warrant must be drawn
unless authorized by law.
(14) To furnish the state treasurer with a daily total dollar amount, by
fund and/or account when requested by the state treasurer, of warrants drawn
upon the treasury.
(15) To authenticate with his signature, his electronic signature, or
his facsimile signature all warrants drawn by him and all copies of official
documents issued from his office.
(16) To charge the state treasurer with money and evidences of indebted-
ness received from, and to credit him for money drawn by, the state board of
land commissioners in the moneys or accounts over which said board has con-
trol.
(17) To act ex officio as member of the state board of canvassers and
state board of land commissioners, secretary of the state board of examin-
ers, and participant in other organizations in the performance of such du-
ties as prescribed by law for such officer.
(18) To create and establish such divisions and other administrative
units within the office as necessary.
(19) To be the official repository of all audit reports of the state and
political subdivisions that are required to be audited pursuant to sections
67-450B, 67-450C, and 67-450D, Idaho Code.
(20) To store, maintain, and publish a current list of agreements en-
tered into by state officers and agencies pursuant to section 67-1085, Idaho
Code.
(21) To store, maintain, and publish a current list of asset forfei-
tures pursuant to section 37-2744, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 37-2744, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
37-2744. FORFEITURES. (a) The following are subject to forfeiture:
(1) All controlled substances that have been manufactured, dis-
tributed, dispensed, acquired, possessed or held in violation of this
act or with respect to which there has been any act by any person in vio-
lation of this act;
(2) All raw materials, products and equipment of any kind that are used,
or intended for use, in manufacturing, compounding, processing, deliv-
ering, importing, or exporting any controlled substances or counter-
feit substances in violation of this act;
(3) All property that is used, or intended for use, as a container
for property used in the commission of an act prohibited by section
37-2732B, 37-2732(a) or (b), or 37-2737A, Idaho Code;


(4) All conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, that
are used, or intended for use, to transport, or in any manner to fa-
cilitate the transportation, delivery, receipt or manufacture of
substances as prohibited by section 37-2732B, 37-2732(a) or (b), or
37-2737A, Idaho Code, but:
(A) No conveyance used by any person as a common carrier in the
transaction of business as a common carrier is subject to forfei-
ture under this section unless it appears that the owner or other
person in charge of the conveyance is a consenting party or privy
to a violation of this act;
(B) No conveyance is subject to forfeiture under this section if
the owner establishes that he could not have known in the exercise
of reasonable diligence that the conveyance was being used, had
been used, was intended to be used or had been intended to be used
in any manner described in subsection (a)(4) of this section;
(C) A forfeiture of a conveyance encumbered by a bona fide secu-
rity interest is subject to the interest of the secured party if
the security interest was created without any knowledge or reason
to believe that the conveyance was being used, had been used, was
intended to be used, or had been intended to be used for the purpose
alleged.
(5) All books, records, and research products and materials, including
formulas, microfilm, tapes, and data that are used, or intended for use,
in violation of this act.
(6)(A) All moneys, currency, negotiable instruments, securities
or other items easily liquidated for cash, such as, but not lim-
ited to, jewelry, stocks and bonds, or other property described in
paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection that is found in close
proximity to property described in paragraph (1), (2), (3), (5),
(7) or (8) of this subsection and that has been used or is intended
for use in connection with the illegal manufacture, distribution,
dispensing or possession of property described in paragraph (1),
(2), (3), (5), (7) or (8) of this subsection;
(B) Items described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph or other
things of value furnished or intended to be furnished by any person
in exchange for a contraband controlled substance in violation of
this chapter, all proceeds, including items of property traceable
to such an exchange, and all moneys or other things of value used or
intended to be used to facilitate any violation of this chapter,
except that no property shall be forfeited under this paragraph
to the extent of the interest of an owner, by reason of any act or
omission established by that owner to have been committed or omit-
ted without the knowledge or consent of that owner.
(7) All drug paraphernalia as defined by section 37-2701, Idaho Code.
(8) All simulated controlled substances, which are used or intended for
use in violation of this chapter.
(9) All weapons, or firearms, which are used in any manner to facilitate
a violation of the provisions of this chapter.
(b) Property subject to forfeiture under this chapter may be seized by
the director, or any peace officer of this state, upon process issued by any


district court, or magistrate division thereof, having jurisdiction over
the property. Seizure without process may be made if:
(1) The seizure is incident to an arrest or a search under a search war-
rant or an inspection under an administrative inspection warrant;
(2) The property subject to seizure has been the subject of a prior
judgment in favor of the state in a criminal racketeering or civil for-
feiture proceeding based upon a violation of this chapter;
(3) Probable cause exists to believe that the property is directly or
indirectly dangerous to health or safety; or
(4) Probable cause exists to believe that the property was used or is
intended to be used in violation of this chapter.
Mere presence or possession of United States currency, without other indicia
of criminal activity, is insufficient cause for seizure.
(c) In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (b) of this sec-
tion, proceedings under subsection (d) of this section shall be instituted
promptly.
(1) When property is seized under this section, the director or the
peace officer who seized the property may:
(A) Place the property under seal;
(B) Remove the property to a place designated by him; or
(C) Take custody of the property and remove it to an appropriate
location for disposition in accordance with law.
(2) The peace officer who seized the property shall within five (5) days
notify the director of such seizure.
(3) In the event of seizure pursuant to subsection (b) of this section,
proceedings under subsection (d) of this section shall be instituted
within thirty (30) days by the director or appropriate prosecuting at-
torney.
(d) Property taken or detained under this section may be subject to re-
plevin during the pendency of the forfeiture proceedings upon a hearing and
finding by the district court, or magistrate division thereof, having juris-
diction over the forfeiture proceedings, that the property is: (i) reason-
ably necessary for the owner's employment or personal use, that the property
will not be disposed of or used for criminal activity, and that reasonable
security has been posted; or (ii) that the seizure violated the provisions
of this section. The right of replevin shall terminate upon an order of for-
feiture as set forth in this section. Property that is being held that has
evidentiary value in the underlying criminal case shall not be subject to re-
plevin. Forfeiture proceedings shall be civil actions against the property
subject to forfeiture and the standard of proof shall be preponderance of the
evidence.
(1) All property described in paragraphs (1), (7) and (8) of subsection
(a) of this section shall be deemed contraband and shall be summarily
forfeited to the state. Controlled substances that are seized or come
into possession of the state, the owners of which are unknown, shall be
deemed contraband and shall be summarily forfeited to the state.
(2) When property described in paragraphs (2), (3), (4), (5), (6) or (9)
of subsection (a) of this section is seized pursuant to this section,
forfeiture proceedings shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the
district court for the county wherein such property is seized. The pro-


cedure governing such proceedings shall be the same as that prescribed
for civil proceedings by the Idaho rules of civil procedure. The court
shall determine whether such property was used, or intended for use,
in violation of this chapter. The court shall also determine whether a
property forfeiture is proportionate to the crime alleged, charged or
proven. Factors to be considered by the court in making such a determi-
nation shall include, but are not limited to, the nature and severity of
the crime, the fair market value of the property, the intangible or sub-
jective value of the property, the hardship to the defendant, the effect
of forfeiture on the defendant's family or financial circumstances, and
any other sanctions or penalties that have been imposed upon the defen-
dant. The court may tailor the forfeiture of property according to its
determination of proportionality as justice requires.
(3) When conveyances, including aircraft, vehicles, or vessels, are
seized pursuant to this section, a complaint instituting forfeiture
proceedings shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the district
court for the county wherein such conveyance is seized.
(A) Notice of forfeiture proceedings shall be given to each owner
or party in interest who has a right, title, or interest which in
the case of a conveyance shall be determined by the record in the
Idaho transportation department, or a similar department of an-
other state if the records are maintained in that state, by serving
a copy of the complaint and summons according to one (1) of the fol-
lowing methods:
(I) Upon each owner or party in interest by mailing a copy of
the complaint and summons by certified mail to the address as
given upon the records of the appropriate department.
(II) Upon each owner or party in interest whose name and ad-
dress is known, by mailing a copy of the notice by registered
mail to the last known address.
(B) Within twenty (20) days after the mailing or publication of
the notice, the owner of the conveyance or claimant may file a ver-
ified answer and claim to the property described in the complaint
instituting forfeiture proceedings.
(C) If at the end of twenty (20) days after the notice has been
mailed there is no verified answer on file, the court shall hear
evidence upon the fact of the unlawful use, or intent to use, and
shall order the property forfeited to the director, or appropriate
prosecuting attorney, if such fact is proved.
(D) If a verified answer is filed, the forfeiture proceeding shall
be set for hearing before the court without a jury on a day not less
than thirty (30) days therefrom; and the proceeding shall have
priority over other civil cases.
(I) At the hearing any owner who has a verified answer on
file may show by competent evidence that the conveyance was
not used or intended to be used in any manner described in
subsection (a)(4) of this section.
(II) At the hearing any owner who has a verified answer on
file may show by competent evidence that his interest in the
conveyance is not subject to forfeiture because he did not


know that the conveyance was being used, had been used, was
intended to be used or had been intended to be used in any
manner described in subsection (a)(4) of this section.
(III) If the court finds that the property was not used or was
not intended to be used in violation of this act, or is not
subject to forfeiture under this act, the court shall order
the property released to the owner as his right, title, or
interest appears on records in the appropriate department as
of the seizure.
(IV) An owner, co-owner or claimant of any right, title, or
interest in the conveyance may prove that his right, title,
or interest, whether under a lien, mortgage, conditional
sales contract or otherwise, was created without any knowl-
edge or reason to believe that the conveyance was being used,
had been used, was intended to be used, or had been intended
to be used for the purpose alleged;
(i) In the event of such proof, the court shall or-
der the conveyance released to the bona fide or inno-
cent owner, purchaser, lienholder, mortgagee, or con-
ditional sales vendor.
(ii) If the amount due to such person is less than the
value of the conveyance, the conveyance may be sold at
public auction by the director or appropriate prose-
cuting attorney. The director, or appropriate prose-
cuting attorney, shall publish a notice of the sale by
at least one (1) publication in a newspaper published
and circulated in the city, community or locality where
the sale is to take place at least one (1) week prior
to sale of the conveyance. The proceeds from such sale
shall be distributed as follows in the order indicated:
1. To the bona fide or innocent owner, purchaser,
conditional sales vendor, lienholder or mort-
gagee of the conveyance, if any, up to the value
of his interest in the conveyance.
2. The balance, if any, in the following order:
A. To the director, or appropriate prose-
cuting attorney, for all expenditures made
or incurred by him in connection with the
sale, including expenditure for any neces-
sary repairs, storage, or transportation
of the conveyance, and for all expendi-
tures made or incurred by him in connection
with the forfeiture proceedings includ-
ing, but not limited to, expenditures for
witnesses' fees, reporters' fees, tran-
scripts, printing, traveling and investi-
gation.
B. To the law enforcement agency of this
state which seized the conveyance for all
expenditures for traveling, investiga-


tion, storage and other expenses made or
incurred after the seizure and in connec-
tion with the forfeiture of any conveyance
seized under this act.
C. The remainder, if any, to the director
for credit to the drug and driving while
under the influence enforcement donation
fund or to the appropriate prosecuting
attorney for credit to the local drug en-
forcement donation fund, or its equiva-
lent.
(iii) In any case, the director, or appropriate pros-
ecuting attorney, may, within thirty (30) days after
judgment, pay the balance due to the bona fide lien-
holder, mortgagee or conditional sales vendor and
thereby purchase the conveyance for use to enforce this
act.
(e) When property is forfeited under this section, or is received from a
federal enforcement agency, the director, or appropriate prosecuting attor-
ney, may:
(1) Upon a showing that the property as set forth in this section is
suited for and likely to be used for law enforcement activities, the
plaintiff or law enforcement agency may, with judicial approval, retain
it for official use;
(2) Sell that which is not required to be destroyed by law and which is
not harmful to the public.
The director, or appropriate prosecuting attorney, shall publish a no-
tice of the sale by at least one (1) publication in a newspaper published
and circulated in the city, community or locality where the sale is to
take place at least one (1) week prior to sale of the property. The pro-
ceeds from such sale shall be distributed as follows in the order indi-
cated:
(A) To the director, or prosecuting attorney on behalf of the
county or city law enforcement agency, for all expenditures made
or incurred in connection with the sale, including expenditure
for any necessary repairs, maintenance, storage or transporta-
tion, and for all expenditures made or incurred in connection
with the forfeiture proceedings including, but not limited to,
expenditures for witnesses' fees, reporters' fees, transcripts,
printing, traveling and investigation.
(B) To the law enforcement agency of this state which seized the
property for all expenditures for traveling, investigation, stor-
age and other expenses made or incurred after the seizure and in
connection with the forfeiture of any property seized under this
act.
(C) The remainder, if any, to the director for credit to the drug
and driving while under the influence enforcement donation fund
or to the appropriate prosecuting attorney for credit to the local
agency's drug enforcement donation fund; or


(3) Take custody of the property and remove it for disposition in accor-
dance with law.
(f)(1) The director or any peace officer of this state seizing any of
the property described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a) of
this section shall cause a written inventory to be made and maintain
custody of the same until all legal actions have been exhausted unless
such property has been placed in lawful custody of a court or state
or federal law enforcement agency. After all legal actions have been
exhausted with respect to such property, the property shall be surren-
dered by the court, law enforcement agency, or person having custody
of the same to the director to be destroyed pursuant to paragraph (2)
of this subsection. The property shall be accompanied with a written
inventory on forms furnished by the director.
(2) All property described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (a)
of this section that is seized or surrendered under the provisions of
this act may be destroyed after all legal actions have been exhausted.
The destruction shall be done under the supervision of the Idaho state
police by a representative of the office of the director. An official
record listing the property destroyed and the location of destruction
shall be kept on file at the office of the director. Except, however,
that the director of the Idaho state police or his designee may autho-
rize the destruction of drug or nondrug evidence, or store those items
at government expense when, in the opinion of the director or his de-
signee, it is not reasonable to remove or transport such items from the
location of the seizure for destruction. In such case, a representative
sample will be removed and preserved for evidentiary purposes and, when
practicable, destroyed as otherwise is in accordance with this chapter.
On-site destruction of such items shall be witnessed by at least two (2)
persons, one (1) of whom shall be the director or his designee who shall
make a record of the destruction.
(g) Species of plants from which controlled substances in schedules I
and II may be derived that have been planted or cultivated in violation of
this act, or of which the owners or cultivators are unknown, or that are wild
growths, may be seized and summarily forfeited to the state.
(h) The failure, upon demand by the director, or his duly authorized
agent, of the person in occupancy or in control of land or premises upon which
the species of plants are growing or being stored, to produce an appropriate
registration, or proof that he is the holder thereof, constitutes authority
for the seizure and forfeiture of the plants.
(i) The director shall have the authority to enter upon any land or into
any dwelling pursuant to a search warrant, to cut, harvest, carry off or de-
stroy such plants described in subsection (g) of this section.
(j)(1) On or before March 31, 2019, and by March 31 of each year there-
after, each state, county, or local law enforcement agency in this state
that has seized or forfeited property pursuant to this section shall re-
tain the following information from the previous calendar year:
(1) (A) Name of the law enforcement agency that seized the prop-
erty;
(2) (B) Date of seizure;


(3) (C) Type and description of property seized, including make,
model, year, and serial number, if applicable;
(4) (D) Crime, if any, for which the suspect has been charged, in-
cluding whether such crime is a violation of state or federal law;
(5) (E) Criminal case number, if any;
(6) (F) Outcome, if any, of suspect's case;
(7) (G) If forfeiture was not processed under state law, the rea-
son for the federal transfer, if known;
(8) (H) Forfeiture case number;
(9) (I) Date of forfeiture decision;
(10) (J) Whether there was a forfeiture settlement agreement;
(11) (K) Date and outcome of property disposition as described by
one (1) of the following: returned to owner, partially returned to
owner, sold, destroyed, or retained by law enforcement; and
(12) (L) Value of the property forfeited based on the value real-
ized, if sold, or a reasonable good faith estimate of the value, if
possible.
(2) Local and county law enforcement agencies shall submit the informa-
tion required by this subsection to the county prosecutor for its juris-
diction on a form as promulgated in rule by the Idaho state police, and
such prosecutor shall retain the form for a period of seven (7) years.
(3) State, county, and local law enforcement agencies shall, by April 1
of each year, submit information described pursuant to this subsection
relating to the previous calendar year to the state controller for stor-
age, maintenance, and publication pursuant to section 67-1001, Idaho
Code.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.